Nebraska, session 109, LB445.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB445 LB445
2025 2025
Section 1. Sections 1 to 19 of this act shall be known and may be
cited as the State Building Construction Alternatives Act.
Sec. 2. For purposes of the State Building Construction
Alternatives Act:
(1) Alternative technical concept means changes suggested by a
qualified, eligible, short-listed design-builder to the division's basic
configurations, project scope, design, or construction criteria;
(2) Best value-based selection process means a process of selecting
a design-builder using price, schedule, and qualifications for evaluation
factors;
(3) Construction manager means the legal entity which proposes to
enter into a construction manager-general contractor contract pursuant to
the State Building Construction Alternatives Act;
(4) Construction manager-general contractor contract means a
contract which is subject to a qualification-based selection process
between the division and a construction manager to furnish
preconstruction services during the design development phase of the
project and, if an agreement can be reached which is satisfactory to the
division, construction services for the construction phase of the
project;
(5) Construction services means activities associated with building
the project;
(6) Design-build contract means a contract between the division and
a design-builder which is subject to a best value-based selection process
to furnish (a) architectural, engineering, and related design services
and (b) labor, materials, supplies, equipment, and construction services;
(7) Design-builder means the legal entity which proposes to enter
into a design-build contract;
(8) Division means the state building division;
(9) Preconstruction services means all nonconstruction-related
services that a construction manager performs in relation to the design
-2-

LB445 LB445
2025 2025
of the project before execution of a contract for construction services.
Preconstruction services includes, but is not limited to, cost
estimating, value engineering studies, constructability reviews, delivery
schedule assessments, and life-cycle analysis;
(10) Project performance criteria means the performance requirements
of the project suitable to allow the design-builder to make a proposal.
Performance requirements shall include, but are not limited to, the
following, if required by the project: Capacity, durability, standards,
ingress and egress requirements, description of the site, surveys, soil
and environmental information concerning the site, material quality
standards, design and milestone dates, site development requirements,
compliance with applicable law, and other criteria for the intended use
of the project;
(11) Proposal means an offer in response to a request for proposals
(a) by a design-builder to enter into a design-build contract or (b) by a
construction manager to enter into a construction manager-general
contractor contract;
(12) Qualification-based selection process means a process of
selecting a construction manager based on qualifications;
(13) Request for proposals means the documentation by which the
division solicits proposals; and
(14) Request for qualifications means the documentation or
publication by which the division solicits qualifications.
Sec. 3. (1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this
section, the purpose of the State Building Construction Alternatives Act
is to provide the division with alternative methods of contracting for
state buildings for which the division has responsibility pursuant to
subsection (1) of section 81-1108.15. The alternative methods of
contracting shall be available to the division for use on any project
regardless of the funding source. The State Building Construction
Alternatives Act shall govern the design-build and construction manager-
-3-

LB445 LB445
2025 2025
general contractor procurement processes for the division.
(2) The State Building Construction Alternatives Act does not apply
to projects to which the Public Water and Natural Resources Project
Contracting Act, the State Park System Construction Alternatives Act, or
the Transportation Innovation Act apply. The State Building Construction
Alternatives Act does not apply to the University of Nebraska or the
state colleges.
Sec. 4. The division, in accordance with the State Building
Construction Alternatives Act, may solicit and execute a design-build
contract or a construction manager-general contractor contract for state
buildings for which the division has responsibility pursuant to
subsection (1) of section 81-1108.15 except as otherwise provided in
section 3 of this act.
Sec. 5. The division may hire an architect licensed pursuant to the
Engineers and Architects Regulation Act or an engineer licensed pursuant
to the act to assist the division with the development of project
performance criteria and requests for proposals, with evaluation of
proposals, with evaluation of the construction to determine adherence to
the project performance criteria, and with any additional services
requested by the division to represent its interests in relation to a
project. The procedures used to hire such person or organization shall
comply with the Nebraska Consultants' Competitive Negotiation Act. The
person or organization hired shall be ineligible to be included as a
provider of other services in a proposal for the project for which he or
she has been hired and shall not be employed by or have a financial or
other interest in a design-builder or construction manager who will
submit a proposal.
Sec. 6. The division shall adopt guidelines for entering into a
design-build contract or construction manager-general contractor
contract. The guidelines shall include the following:
(1) Preparation and content of requests for qualifications;
-4-

LB445 LB445
2025 2025
(2) Preparation and content of requests for proposals;
(3) Qualification and short-listing of design-builders and
construction managers. The guidelines shall provide that the division
will evaluate prospective design-builders and construction managers based
on the information submitted to the division in response to a request for
qualifications and will select a short list of design-builders or
construction managers who shall be considered qualified and eligible to
respond to the request for proposals;
(4) Preparation and submittal of proposals;
(5) Procedures and standards for evaluating proposals;
(6) Procedures for negotiations between the division and the design-
builders or construction managers submitting proposals prior to the
acceptance of a proposal if any such negotiations are contemplated; and
(7) Procedures for the evaluation of construction under a design-
build contract to determine adherence to the project performance
criteria.
Sec. 7. The process for selecting a design-builder and entering
into a design-build contract shall be in accordance with sections 8 to 11
of this act.
Sec. 8. (1) The division shall prepare a request for qualifications
for design-build proposals and shall prequalify design-builders. The
request for qualifications shall describe the project in sufficient
detail to permit a design-builder to respond. The request for
qualifications shall identify the maximum number of design-builders the
division will place on a short list as qualified and eligible to receive
a request for proposals.
(2) A person or organization hired by the division under section 5
of this act shall be ineligible to compete for a design-build contract on
the same project for which the person or organization was hired.
(3)(a) The request for qualifications shall be published:
(i) In a newspaper of statewide circulation once a week for three
-5-

LB445 LB445
2025 2025
consecutive weeks prior to the deadline for receiving requests for
qualifications; or
(ii) For twenty-one consecutive calendar days prior to the deadline
for receiving requests for qualifications on a website designated by the
division that is accessible to the public.
(b) The division may publish notice both in such a newspaper and on
such a website as described in this subsection.
(4) The division shall create a short list of qualified and eligible
design-builders in accordance with the guidelines adopted pursuant to
section 6 of this act. The division shall select at least two prospective
design-builders, except that if only one design-builder has responded to
the request for qualifications, the division may, in its discretion,
proceed or cancel the procurement. The request for proposals shall be
sent only to the design-builders placed on the short list.
Sec. 9. The division shall prepare a request for proposals for each
design-build contract. The request for proposals shall contain, at a
minimum, the following elements:
(1) The guidelines adopted by the division in accordance with
section 6 of this act. The identification of a publicly accessible
location of the guidelines, either physical or electronic, shall be
considered compliance with this subdivision;
(2) The proposed terms and conditions of the design-build contract,
including any terms and conditions which are subject to further
negotiation;
(3) A project statement which contains information about the scope
and nature of the project;
(4) A statement regarding alternative technical concepts including
the process and time period in which such concepts may be submitted,
confidentiality of the concepts, and ownership of the rights to the
intellectual property contained in such concepts;
(5) Project performance criteria;
-6-

LB445 LB445
2025 2025
(6) Budget parameters for the project;
(7) Any bonding and insurance required by law or as may be
additionally required by the division;
(8) The criteria for evaluation of proposals and the relative weight
of each criterion. The criteria shall include, but are not limited to,
the cost of the work, construction experience, design experience, and the
financial, personnel, and equipment resources available for the project.
The relative weight to apply to any criterion shall be at the discretion
of the division based on each project, except that in all cases, the cost
of the work shall be given a relative weight of at least fifty percent;
(9) A requirement that the design-builder provide a written
statement of the design-builder's proposed approach to the design and
construction of the project, which may include graphic materials
illustrating the proposed approach to design and construction and shall
include price proposals;
(10) A requirement that the design-builder agree to the following
conditions:
(a) At the time of the design-build proposal, the design-builder
must furnish to the division a written statement identifying the
architect or engineer who will perform the architectural or engineering
work for the project. The architect or engineer engaged by the design-
builder to perform the architectural or engineering work with respect to
the project must have direct supervision of such work and may not be
removed by the design-builder prior to the completion of the project
without the written consent of the division;
(b) At the time of the design-build proposal, the design-builder
must furnish to the division a written statement identifying the general
contractor who will provide the labor, material, supplies, equipment, and
construction services. The general contractor identified by the design-
builder may not be removed by the design-builder prior to completion of
the project without the written consent of the division;
-7-

LB445 LB445
2025 2025
(c) A design-builder offering design-build services with its own
employees who are design professionals licensed to practice in Nebraska
must (i) comply with the Engineers and Architects Regulation Act by
procuring a certificate of authorization to practice architecture or
engineering and (ii) submit proof of sufficient professional liability
insurance in the amount required by the division; and
(d) The rendering of architectural or engineering services by a
licensed architect or engineer employed by the design-builder must
conform to the Engineers and Architects Regulation Act; and
(11) Other information or requirements which the division, in its
discretion, chooses to include in the request for proposals.
Sec. 10. The division shall pay a stipend to qualified design-
builders that submit responsive proposals but are not selected. Payment
of the stipend shall give the division ownership of the intellectual
property contained in the proposals and alternative technical concepts.
The amount of the stipend shall be at the discretion of the division. The
refusal to pay or accept the stipend shall leave the intellectual
property contained in the proposals and alternative technical concepts in
the possession of the creator of the proposals and alternative technical
concepts.
Sec. 11. (1) Design-builders shall submit proposals as required by
the request for proposals. The division may meet with individual design-
builders prior to the time of submitting the proposal and may have
discussions concerning alternative technical concepts. If an alternative
technical concept provides a solution that is equal to or better than the
requirements in the request for proposals and the alternative technical
concept is acceptable to the division, it may be incorporated as part of
the proposal by the design-builder. Notwithstanding any other provision
of state law to the contrary, alternative technical concepts shall be
confidential and not disclosed to other design-builders or members of the
public from the time the proposals are submitted until such proposals are
-8-

LB445 LB445
2025 2025
opened by the division.
(2) Proposals shall be sealed and shall not be opened until
expiration of the time established for making the proposals as set forth
in the request for proposals.
(3) Proposals may be withdrawn at any time prior to the opening of
such proposals in which case no stipend shall be paid. The division shall
have the right to reject any and all proposals at no cost to the division
other than any stipend for design-builders who have submitted responsive
proposals. The division may thereafter solicit new proposals using the
same or different project performance criteria or may cancel the design-
build solicitation.
(4) The division shall rank the design-builders in order of best
value pursuant to the criteria in the request for proposals. The division
may meet with design-builders prior to ranking.
(5) The division may attempt to negotiate a design-build contract
with the highest ranked design-builder selected by the division and may
enter into a design-build contract after negotiations. If the division is
unable to negotiate a satisfactory design-build contract with the highest
ranked design-builder, the division may terminate negotiations with that
design-builder. The division may then undertake negotiations with the
second highest ranked design-builder and may enter into a design-build
contract after negotiations. If the division is unable to negotiate a
satisfactory contract with the second highest ranked design-builder, the
division may undertake negotiations with the third highest ranked design-
builder, if any, and may enter into a design-build contract after
negotiations.
(6) If the division is unable to negotiate a satisfactory contract
with any of the ranked design-builders, the division may either revise
the request for proposals and solicit new proposals or cancel the design-
build process under the State Building Construction Alternatives Act.
Sec. 12. The process for selecting a construction manager and
-9-

LB445 LB445
2025 2025
entering into a construction manager-general contractor contract shall be
in accordance with sections 13 to 16 of this act.
Sec. 13. (1) The division shall prepare a request for
qualifications for construction manager-general contractor contract
proposals and shall prequalify construction managers. The request for
qualifications shall describe the project in sufficient detail to permit
a construction manager to respond. The request for qualifications shall
identify the maximum number of eligible construction managers the
division will place on a short list as qualified and eligible to receive
a request for proposals.
(2)(a) The request for qualifications shall be published:
(i) In a newspaper of statewide circulation once a week for three
consecutive weeks prior to the deadline for receiving requests for
qualifications; or
(ii) For twenty-one consecutive calendar days prior to the deadline
for receiving requests for qualifications on a website designated by the
division that is accessible to the public.
(b) The division may publish notice both in such a newspaper and on
such a website as described in this subsection.
(3) The division shall create a short list of qualified and eligible
construction managers in accordance with the guidelines adopted pursuant
to section 6 of this act. The division shall select at least two
construction managers, except that if only one construction manager has
responded to the request for qualifications, the division may, in its
discretion, proceed or cancel the procurement. The request for proposals
shall be sent only to the construction managers placed on the short list.
Sec. 14. The division shall prepare a request for proposals for
each construction manager-general contractor contract. The request for
proposals shall contain, at a minimum, the following elements:
(1) The guidelines adopted by the division in accordance with
section 6 of this act. The identification of a publicly accessible
-10-

LB445 LB445
2025 2025
location of the guidelines, either physical or electronic, shall be
considered compliance with this subdivision;
(2) The proposed terms and conditions of the contract, including any
terms and conditions which are subject to further negotiation;
(3) Any bonding and insurance required by law or as may be
additionally required by the division;
(4) General information about the project which will assist the
division in its selection of the construction manager, including a
project statement which contains information about the scope and nature
of the project, the project site, the schedule, and the estimated budget;
(5) The criteria for evaluation of proposals and the relative weight
of each criterion;
(6) A statement that the construction manager shall not be allowed
to sublet, assign, or otherwise dispose of any portion of the contract
without consent of the division. In no case shall the division allow the
construction manager to sublet more than seventy percent of the work,
excluding specialty items; and
(7) Other information or requirements which the division, in its
discretion, chooses to include in the request for proposals.
Sec. 15. (1) Construction managers shall submit proposals as
required by the request for proposals.
(2) Proposals shall be sealed and shall not be opened until
expiration of the time established for making the proposals as set forth
in the request for proposals.
(3) Proposals may be withdrawn at any time prior to signing a
contract for preconstruction services. The division shall have the right
to reject any and all proposals at no cost to the division. The division
may thereafter solicit new proposals or may cancel the construction
manager-general contractor procurement process.
(4) The division shall rank the construction managers in accordance
with the qualification-based selection process and pursuant to the
-11-

LB445 LB445
2025 2025
criteria in the request for proposals. The division may meet with
construction managers prior to the ranking.
(5) The division may attempt to negotiate a contract for
preconstruction services with the highest ranked construction manager and
may enter into a contract for preconstruction services after
negotiations. If the division is unable to negotiate a satisfactory
contract for preconstruction services with the highest ranked
construction manager, the division may terminate negotiations with that
construction manager. The division may then undertake negotiations with
the second highest ranked construction manager and may enter into a
contract for preconstruction services after negotiations. If the division
is unable to negotiate a satisfactory contract with the second highest
ranked construction manager, the division may undertake negotiations with
the third highest ranked construction manager, if any, and may enter into
a contract for preconstruction services after negotiations.
(6) If the division is unable to negotiate a satisfactory contract
for preconstruction services with any of the ranked construction
managers, the division may either revise the request for proposals and
solicit new proposals or cancel the construction manager-general
contractor contract process under the State Building Construction
Alternatives Act.
Sec. 16. (1) Before the construction manager begins any
construction services, the division shall:
(a) Conduct an independent cost estimate for the project; and
(b) Conduct contract negotiations with the construction manager to
develop a construction manager-general contractor contract for
construction services.
(2) If the construction manager and the division are unable to
negotiate a contract, the division may use other contract procurement
processes as provided by law. Persons or organizations who submitted
proposals but were unable to negotiate a contract with the division shall
-12-

LB445 LB445
2025 2025
be eligible to compete in the other contract procurement processes.
Sec. 17. A design-build contract and a construction manager-general
contractor contract may be conditioned upon later refinements in scope
and price and may permit the division in agreement with the design-
builder or construction manager to make changes in the project without
invalidating the contract.
Sec. 18. Nothing in the State Building Construction Alternatives
Act shall limit or reduce statutory or regulatory requirements regarding
insurance.
Sec. 19. The division may adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations to carry out the State Building Construction Alternatives
Act.
Sec. 20. Section 72-803, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
72-803 (1) The state and any department or agency thereof, subject
to the powers of the state building division of the Department of
Administrative Services, shall have general charge of the erection of new
buildings which are being erected for such department or agency, the
repair and improvement of buildings under the control of such department
or agency, including fire escapes, and the improvement of grounds under
the control of such department or agency.
(2) Buildings and other improvements costing more than seventy-five
fifty thousand dollars shall be (a) constructed under the general charge
of the department or agency as provided in subsection (1) of this section
and (b) let by contract to the lowest responsible bidder after proper
advertisement as set forth in subsection (4) of this section. The
Department of Administrative Services shall adjust the dollar amounts in
this subsection every four years beginning January 1, 2026, to account
for inflationary and market changes. The department shall select a
construction cost index or any other published index relevant to
operations and utilities costs and shall base the adjustments on the
-13-

LB445 LB445
2025 2025
percentage changes in such index.
(3) The successful bidder at the letting shall enter into a contract
with the department or agency, prepared as provided for by subsection (4)
of this section, and shall furnish a bond for the faithful performance of
his or her contract, except that a performance bond shall not be required
for any project which has a total cost of one hundred thousand dollars or
less unless the department or agency includes a bond requirement in the
specifications for the project.
(4) When contracts are to be let by the department or agency as
provided in subsection (2) of this section, advertisements shall be
published in accordance with rules and regulations adopted and
promulgated by the state building division stating that sealed proposals
will be received by the department or agency at its office on the date
therein stated for the furnishing of materials, the construction of
buildings, or the making of repairs or improvements and that plans and
specifications can be seen at the office of the department or agency. All
bids or proposals shall be accompanied by a certified check or by a bid
bond in a sum fixed by the department or agency and payable thereto. All
such contracts shall be awarded to the lowest responsible bidder, but the
right shall be reserved to reject any and all bids. Whenever any material
described in any contract can be obtained from any state institution, the
department or agency shall exclude it from such a contract.
Sec. 21. Section 73-101, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
73-101 Whenever the State of Nebraska, or any department or any
agency thereof, any county board, county clerk, county highway
superintendent, the mayor and city council or commissioner of any
municipality, any entity created pursuant to the Interlocal Cooperation
Act or the Joint Public Agency Act, or the officers of any school
district, township, or other governmental subdivision, shall advertise
for bids in pursuance of any statutes of the State of Nebraska, on any
-14-

LB445 LB445
2025 2025
road contract work or any public improvements work, or for supplies,
construction, repairs, and improvements, and in all other cases where
bids for supplies or work, of any character whatsoever, are received for
the various departments and agencies of the state, and other subdivisions
and agencies enumerated in this section, they shall fix not only the day
upon which such bids shall be returned, received, or opened, as provided
by other statutes, but shall also fix the hour at which such bids shall
close, or be received or opened, and they shall also provide that such
bids shall be immediately and simultaneously opened in the presence of
the bidders, or representatives of the bidders, when the hour is reached
for the bids to close. Such bids may be withheld from disclosure until an
intent to award is issued. If bids are being opened on more than one
contract, the officials having in charge the opening of such bids may, if
they deem it advisable, award each contract as the bids are opened.
Sections 73-101 to 73-106 shall not apply to the State Building
Construction Alternatives Act, the State Park System Construction
Alternatives Act, or sections 39-2808 to 39-2823.
Sec. 22. Section 73-307, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
73-307 Sections 73-301 to 73-306 shall not apply to the Nebraska
Consultants' Competitive Negotiation Act, the State Building Construction
Alternatives Act, the State Park System Construction Alternatives Act,
sections 39-2808 to 39-2823, or section 57-1503.
Sections 73-301 to 73-306 shall not be construed to apply to
renewals of contracts already approved pursuant to or not subject to such
sections, to amendments to such contracts, or to renewals of such
amendments unless the amendments would directly cause or result in the
replacement by the private entity of additional permanent state employees
or positions greater than the replacement caused by the original
contract.
Sec. 23. Section 81-1108.15, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
-15-

LB445 LB445
2025 2025
is amended to read:
81-1108.15 (1) Except as provided in the Nebraska State Capitol
Preservation and Restoration Act, the division shall have the primary
functions and responsibilities of statewide facilities planning,
facilities construction, and facilities administration and shall adopt
and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out this section.
(2) Facilities planning shall include the following responsibilities
and duties:
(a) To maintain utilization records of all state-owned, state-
occupied, and vacant facilities;
(b) To coordinate comprehensive capital facilities planning;
(c) To define and review program statements based on space
utilization standards;
(d) To prepare or review planning and construction documents;
(e) To develop and maintain time-cost schedules for capital
construction projects;
(f) To assist the Governor and the Legislative Fiscal Analyst in the
preparation of the capital construction budget recommendations;
(g) To maintain a complete inventory of all state-owned, state-
occupied, and vacant sites and structures and to review the proposals for
naming such sites and structures;
(h) To determine space needs of all state agencies and establish
space-allocation standards; and
(i) To cause a state comprehensive capital facilities plan to be
developed; and .
(j) To carry out the State Building Construction Alternatives Act.
(3) Facilities construction shall include the following powers and
duties:
(a) To maintain close contact with and conduct inspections of each
project so as to assure execution of time-cost schedules and efficient
contract performance if such project's total design and construction cost
-16-

LB445 LB445
2025 2025
is equal to or greater than the project cost set by subdivision (1)(a) of
section 81-1108.43 as adjusted by subsection (2) of section 81-1108.43;
(b) To perform final acceptance inspections and evaluations; and
(c) To coordinate all change or modification orders and progress
payment orders.
(4) Facilities administration shall include the following powers and
duties:
(a) To serve as state leasing administrator or agent for all
facilities to be leased for use by the state and for all state-owned
facilities to be rented to state agencies or other parties subject to
section 81-1108.22. The division shall remit the proceeds from any
rentals of state-owned facilities to the State Treasurer for credit to
the State Building Revolving Fund and the State Building Renewal
Assessment Fund;
(b) To provide all maintenance, repairs, custodial duties, security,
and administration for all buildings and grounds owned or leased by the
State of Nebraska except as provided in subsections (5) and (6) of this
section;
(c) To be responsible for adequate parking and the designation of
parking stalls or spaces, including access aisles, in offstreet parking
facilities for the exclusive use of handicapped or disabled or
temporarily handicapped or disabled persons pursuant to section 18-1737;
(d) To ensure that all state-owned, state-occupied, and vacant
facilities are maintained or utilized to their maximum capacity or to
dispose of such facilities through lease, sale, or demolition;
(e) To submit electronically a report an annual report to the
Appropriations Committee of the Legislature and the Committee on Building
Maintenance regarding the amount of property leased by the state and the
availability of state-owned property for the needs of state agencies,
upon request by the Appropriations Committee of the Legislature, the
Committee on Building Maintenance, or a member of the Legislature;
-17-

LB445 LB445
2025 2025
(f) To report monthly time-cost data on projects to the Governor and
the Clerk of the Legislature. The report submitted to the Clerk of the
Legislature shall be submitted electronically;
(f) (g) To administer the State Emergency Capital Construction
Contingency Fund;
(g) (h) To submit status reports to the Governor and the Legislative
Fiscal Analyst after each quarter of a construction project is completed
detailing change orders and expenditures to date. The report submitted to
the Legislative Fiscal Analyst shall be submitted electronically. Such
reports shall be required on all projects costing an amount equal to or
greater than the amount set forth in subdivision (1)(a) of section
81-1108.43 as adjusted by subsection (2) of section 81-1108.43 and on
such other projects as may be designated by the division; and
(h) (i) To submit a final report on each project to the Governor and
the Legislative Fiscal Analyst. The report submitted to the Legislative
Fiscal Analyst shall be submitted electronically. Such report shall
include, but not be limited to, a comparison of final costs and
appropriations made for the project, change orders, and modifications and
whether the construction complied with the related approved program
statement. Such reports shall be required on all projects costing an
amount equal to or greater than the amount set forth in subdivision (1)
(a) of section 81-1108.43 as adjusted by subsection (2) of section
81-1108.43 and on such other projects as may be designated by the
division.
(5) Subdivisions (4)(b), (c), and (d) of this section shall not
apply to (a) state-owned facilities to be rented to state agencies or
other parties by the University of Nebraska, the Nebraska state colleges,
the Department of Transportation, and the Board of Educational Lands and
Funds, (b) buildings and grounds owned or leased for use by the
University of Nebraska, the Nebraska state colleges, and the Board of
Educational Lands and Funds, (c) buildings and grounds owned, leased, or
-18-

LB445 LB445
2025 2025
operated by the Department of Correctional Services, (d) facilities to be
leased for nonoffice use by the Department of Transportation, (e)
buildings or grounds owned or leased by the Game and Parks Commission if
the application of such subdivisions to the buildings or grounds would
result in ineligibility for or repayment of federal funding, (f)
buildings or grounds of the state park system, state recreation areas,
state historical parks, state wildlife management areas, or state
recreational trails, or (g) other buildings or grounds owned or leased by
the State of Nebraska which are specifically exempted by the division
because the application of such subdivisions would result in the
ineligibility for federal funding or would result in hardship on an
agency, board, or commission due to other exceptional or unusual
circumstances, except that nothing in this subdivision shall prohibit the
assessment of building rental depreciation charges to tenants of
facilities owned by the state and under the direct control and
maintenance of the division.
(6) Security for all buildings and grounds owned or leased by the
State of Nebraska in Lincoln, Nebraska, except the buildings and grounds
described in subsection (5) of this section, shall be the responsibility
of the Nebraska State Patrol. The Nebraska State Patrol shall consult
with the Governor, the Chief Justice, the Executive Board of the
Legislative Council, and the State Capitol Administrator regarding
security policy within the State Capitol and capitol grounds.
(7) Each member of the Legislature shall receive an electronic copy
of the reports required by subdivisions (4)(g) and (h) (4)(f), (h), and
(i) of this section by making a request for them to the State Building
Administrator. The information on such reports shall be submitted to the
division by the agency responsible for the project.
Sec. 24. Section 81-1701, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-1701 The purpose of the Nebraska Consultants' Competitive
-19-

LB445 LB445
2025 2025
Negotiation Act is to provide managerial control over competitive
negotiations by the state for acquisition of professional architectural,
engineering, landscape architecture, or land surveying services. The act
does not apply to (1) contracts under section 57-1503, (2) contracts
under subsection (6) of section 39-1349, (3) contracts under sections
39-2808 to 39-2823 except as provided in section 39-2810, or (4)
contracts under the State Park System Construction Alternatives Act
except as provided in section 37-1719, or (5) contracts under the State
Building Construction Alternatives Act except as provided in section 5 of
this act.
Sec. 25. Section 82-316, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
82-316 There is hereby created the Nebraska Arts Council Cash Fund.
The fund shall contain all sums of money received from fees from any
conference, performance, or exhibition held by the council or by groups
who have contracted with the council for such events and all sums of
money collected under section 82-326. The Nebraska Arts Council shall use
the fund to pay the costs related to the administration and sponsoring of
any conference, performance, or exhibition by the Nebraska Arts Council
or by groups who have contracted with the council for such events or to
pay the costs related to the repair, restoration, and maintenance of
artwork installed under sections 82-317 to 82-329, 85-106 to 85-106.03,
and 85-304 to 85-304.03. All disbursements shall be made upon warrants
drawn by the Director of Administrative Services. Any money in the fund
available for investment shall be invested by the state investment
officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska
State Funds Investment Act.
Sec. 26. Section 85-106, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
85-106 The Board of Regents shall have the power:
(1) To enact laws for the government of the university;
-20-

LB445 LB445
2025 2025
(2) To elect a president, vice presidents, chancellors, vice
chancellors, deans, associate deans, assistant deans, directors,
associate directors, assistant directors, professors, associate
professors, assistant professors, instructors, other members of the
faculty staff, and employees generally of the university and to provide
for academic tenure for professors, associate professors, and assistant
professors;
(3) To prescribe the duties of such persons not inconsistent with
section 85-1,105;
(4) To fix their compensation;
(5) To provide, in its discretion, retirement benefits for present
and future employees of the university, subject to the following:
(a) The cost of such retirement benefits shall be funded in
accordance with sound actuarial principles with the necessary
contributions for both past service and future service being treated in
the university budget in the same way as any other operating expense;
(b) The university contribution under any such retirement plan shall
be (i) the rate established by the Board of Regents and not more than
eight percent of each university employee's full-time salary or wage
earnings for any calendar year before any agreement for reduction of
salary or wage earnings and (ii) pursuant to an agreement for reduction
of salary or wage earnings, the amount of the reduction of salary or wage
earnings;
(c) Each employee's contribution shall be the rate established by
the Board of Regents and shall not be required to exceed the university's
contribution under subdivision (5)(b)(i) of this section, except that in
lieu of making such contribution, each such employee may enter into an
agreement for reduction of salary or wages for the purchase by the Board
of Regents of annuity contracts for such employee, under the provisions
of the Internal Revenue Code, but the amount of the reduction of salary
or wages allowable under this subdivision may not include credit for
-21-

LB445 LB445
2025 2025
service prior to March 29, 1972;
(d) The retirement benefits of any employee for service prior to
September 1, 1961, shall be those provided under the retirement plan then
in force, which benefits shall not be abridged, except that such
retirement benefits shall become fully vested in the event of an
employee's termination of employment if such employee has at least ten
years of service at the date of termination;
(e) Continued contributions to the system until the date of
retirement as provided in section 85-606; and
(f) The investment of retirement funds shall be pursuant to the
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment
Act, but no change in the type of investment of such funds shall be made
without the prior approval of the Board of Regents;
(6) To equalize and provide for uniform benefits for all present and
future employees, including group life insurance, group hospital-medical
insurance, group long-term disability income insurance, and retirement
benefits;
(7) To provide, through the University Extension Division, for the
holding of classes at various localities throughout the state avoiding
unnecessary duplication of courses offered by other educational
institutions in such localities and consistent with the orders of the
Coordinating Commission for Postsecondary Education issued pursuant to
sections 85-1413 and 85-1414;
(8) To remove the president, vice presidents, chancellors, vice
chancellors, deans, associate deans, assistant deans, directors,
associate directors, assistant directors, professors, associate
professors, assistant professors, instructors, other members of the
faculty staff, and employees generally, when the interests of the
university require it; and
(9) To pay expenses for recruitment of academic, administrative,
professional, and managerial personnel.
-22-

LB445 LB445
2025 2025
The Board of Regents shall institute a continuing program of
preventive maintenance and a program of deferred maintenance consistent
with the provisions of the Deferred Building Renewal Act and shall
consult with the Nebraska Arts Council and acquire works of art for the
original construction of any public building under its supervision
consistent with sections 82-317 to 82-329 and 85-106.01 to 85-106.03.
Sec. 27. Section 85-304, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
85-304 (1) The Board of Trustees of the Nebraska State Colleges
shall have the power:
(a) To appoint a president and such other persons as may be required
for each state college;
(b) To fix their compensation and prescribe their duties;
(c) To remove all persons appointed, but the affirmative votes of
four members of the board shall be necessary to remove a president or an
assistant during the time for which such persons were appointed;
(d) Through an extension division, to provide for holding of classes
at various localities throughout the state, avoiding unnecessary
duplication of courses offered by other educational institutions in such
localities;
(e) To acquire real and personal property and dispose of the same
whenever any of the state colleges will be benefited thereby, but no
grounds upon which any buildings of any of the state colleges are located
shall be disposed of without the consent of the Legislature;
(f) To pay expenses for recruitment of academic, administrative,
professional, and managerial personnel; and
(g) To provide benefits for all present and future employees,
including group life insurance, group hospital-medical insurance, and
group long-term disability income insurance.
(2) The board shall have the duty:
(2) The board shall (a) To institute a continuing program of
-23-

LB445 LB445
2025 2025
preventive maintenance and a program of deferred maintenance consistent
with the provisions of the Deferred Building Renewal Act. ; and
(b) To consult with the Nebraska Arts Council and acquire works of
art for the original construction of any public building under its
supervision consistent with sections 82-317 to 82-329 and 85-304 to
85-304.03.
Sec. 28. Original sections 72-803, 73-307, 81-1108.15, 81-1701,
82-316, 85-106, and 85-304, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, and
section 73-101, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are
repealed.
Sec. 29. The following sections are outright repealed: Sections
82-317, 82-318, 82-319, 82-320, 82-321, 82-322, 82-323, 82-324, 82-325,
82-326, 82-327, 82-328, 82-329, 85-106.01, 85-106.02, 85-106.03,
85-304.01, 85-304.02, and 85-304.03, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska.
-24-